Ohio, session 136, HB311.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Ohio: Section 1. That section 5.2322 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5.2322. The third full week of May is designated as "EMS week in Ohio." Speaker ___________________ of the House of Representatives. President ___________________ of the Senate. Passed ________________________, 20____ Approved ________________________, 20____ Governor. The section numbering of law of a general and permanent nature is complete and in conformity with the Revised Code. Director, Legislative Service Commission. Filed in the office of the Secretary of State at Columbus, Ohio, on the ____ day of ___________, A. D. 20____. Secretary of State. File No. _________	Effective Date ___________________